Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES AND OVERSIGHT COMMITTEES

CHAPTER 328. CRIMINAL JUSTICE LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE

Sec. 328.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "committee" means the Criminal Justice Legislative Oversight Committee.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.002. ESTABLISHMENT; COMPOSITION. (a) The Criminal Justice Legislative Oversight Committee is established to provide objective research, analysis, and recommendations to help guide state criminal justice policies.

(b) The committee is composed of six members as follows:

(1) the chair of the Senate Committee on Criminal Justice;

(2) the chair of the House Committee on Corrections;

(3) two members of the senate appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(4) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(c) In making appointments under Subsection (b)(3) or (4), the lieutenant governor or the speaker of the house of representatives, as applicable, shall give first consideration to members of the senate or the house of representatives who are members of the Senate Committee on Finance or the House Appropriations Committee.

(d) An appointed member of the committee serves at the pleasure of the appointing official.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.003. PRESIDING OFFICER; TERM. (a) The lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the presiding officer of the committee on an alternating basis.

(b) The presiding officer of the committee serves a two-year term that expires February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.004. POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The committee shall:

(1) use statistical analyses and other research methods to conduct an in-depth examination of the criminal justice system in this state that includes:

(A) an assessment of the cost-effectiveness of the use of state and local funds in the criminal justice system;

(B) an identification of critical problems in the criminal justice system; and

(C) a determination of the long-range needs of the criminal justice system;

(2) recommend to the legislature:

(A) strategies to solve the problems identified under Subdivision (1)(B); and

(B) policy priorities to address the long-range needs determined under Subdivision (1)(C); and

(3) advise and assist the legislature in developing plans, programs, and proposed legislation to improve the effectiveness of the criminal justice system.

(b) The committee has all other powers and duties provided to a special committee by:

(1) Subchapter B, Chapter 301;

(2) the rules of the senate and the house of representatives; and

(3) policies of the senate and house committees on administration.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.005. MEETINGS. The committee shall meet at the call of the presiding officer.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.006. STAFF; AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. The committee may hire staff or may contract with universities or other suitable entities to assist the committee in carrying out the committee's duties. Funding to support the operation of the committee shall be provided from funds appropriated to the Texas Legislative Council.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 328.007. REPORT. Not later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the committee shall submit to the legislature a report that contains the recommendations described by Section 328.004(a)(2).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 13, eff. June 15, 2007.